Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1613.04
Assessment roll and tax list; corrections.

The county assessor after July 25, or after August 10 in counties that have adopted a resolution to extend the deadline for hearing protests under section 77-1502, and with approval of the county board of equalization shall correct the assessment roll and the tax list, if necessary, in the case of a clerical error as defined in section 77-128 that results in a change in the value of the real property. Clerical errors that do not result in a change of value on the assessment roll may be corrected at any time by the county assessor. All corrections to the tax list shall be made as provided in section 77-1613.02.

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 30;

Laws 2005, LB 283, § 7.